District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0673.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Volunteer Services Clarification Temporary Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. Section 3 of the Volunteers Services Act of 1977, effective June 28, 1977 (D.C.
Law 2-12; D.C. Official Code § 1-319.02), is amended by striking the phrase “District of
Columbia Board of Education” and inserting the phrase “Office of the State Superintendent of
Education, Attorney General for the District of Columbia,” in its place.
Sec. 3. Applicability.
This act shall apply as of April 15, 2026.
Sec. 4. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Budget Director as the fiscal impact
statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 5. Effective date.
(a) This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by
the Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
review as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved
December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).
(b) This act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
2